District of Columbia statutes.
47-1263

Assessments on nursing facilities.

(a)

Except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, each nursing facility in the District of Columbia shall pay to the Mayor an assessment of up to 6% per annum of net resident revenue. The assessment shall be a uniform amount per licensed bed, and the amount shall be determined as follows:

(1)

For fiscal year 2005, the assessment shall be $3,600 per licensed bed annually, or the appropriate pro-rata amount based upon that total if the assessment is in effect for less than the entire fiscal year.

(2)

For fiscal year 2006 and each succeeding fiscal year, the Mayor shall determine the uniform amount per licensed bed by rules issued pursuant to § 47-1267.

(b)

Except for fiscal year 2005, the Mayor shall require each nursing facility to provide to the Office of Tax and Revenue a self-assessment of the amount owed based on net resident revenue as provided in subsection (a) of this section for the ensuing fiscal year of the District no later than September 1.

(c)

Each nursing facility shall pay the assessment required by subsection (a) of this section to the Mayor in equal monthly installments.

(d)

Each nursing facility shall report net resident revenue for the period upon which the assessment for a fiscal year is to be determined under subsection (a)(2) of this section by submitting an audited financial statement and other information for that period as the Mayor may prescribe by rules issued pursuant to § 47-1267.

(e)

The Chief Financial Officer may determine the manner in which payments are made under this chapter, including whether payments owed by each nursing facility under subsection (a) of this section shall be paid electronically.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5202(c), 51 DCR 8441
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1242(a), 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 5(h), 53 DCR 6794
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5027, 55 DCR 7598
This section is referenced in § 47-1266 and § 47-1268.
D.C. Law 16-33, rewrote subsec. (b) and added subsec. (e). Prior to amendment, subsec. (b) read as follows: “(b) Except for fiscal Year 2005, the Mayor shall provide notice to each nursing facility of the amount of the assessment for the ensuing fiscal year no later than September 1.” Law 16-191 validated a previously made change in the designation of subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 17-219, in the lead-in language, inserted “up to” preceding “6%”; and rewrote par. (2), which had read as follows: “(2) For fiscal year 2006 and each succeeding fiscal year, the Mayor shall determine the uniform amount per licensed bed that will equal 6% per annum of net resident revenue by rules issued pursuant to § 47-1267.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1242(a) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 5027 of Fiscal Year 2009 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-468, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8746).

Short title of subtitle CC of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1241 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle CC of title I of the act may be cited as the Nursing Home Provider Tax Technical Amendments Act of 2005.

Short title: Section 5026 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle K of title V of the act may be cited as the “Nursing Facility Quality of Care Act of 2008”.